Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1525
Goods unsold; additional writ; notice of sale.

The officer who levies upon goods and chattels by virtue of an execution issued by a court of record, before he proceeds to sell the same, shall cause public notice to be given of the time and place of sale. The notice shall be given by publication once in each week for four successive weeks in some newspaper printed in the county, or in case no newspaper be printed therein, by posting notice in five public places in the county, two in the precinct where the sale is to be held. Where goods and chattels levied upon cannot be sold for want of bidders, the officer making such return shall annex to the execution a true and perfect inventory of such goods and chattels, and the plaintiff in such execution may thereupon sue out another writ of execution, directing the sale of the property levied upon as aforesaid; but such goods and chattels shall not be sold unless public notice of the time and place of sale has been given as hereinbefore provided.

R.S.1867, Code § 490, p. 476;

R.S.1913, § 8066;

C.S.1922, § 9007;

C.S.1929, § 20-1525;

R.S.1943, § 25-1525;

Laws 1971, LB 47, § 3.

This section adopts the writ of venditioni exponas under which an officer is commanded to sell property already levied upon. Burkett v. Clark, 46 Neb. 466, 64 N.W. 1113 (1895).